ru: Материал подвеса: Хлопковая веревка; Металлический трос; Металлическая цепь; Полиэстеровая веревка; Синтетическая стропа; Другой
bg-BG: Материал на окачването: Памучно въже; Метално въже; Метална верига; Полиестерно въже; Синтетична лента; Друго
nb: Fjæringsmateriale: Bomullstau; Metallkabel; Metallkjetting; Polyestertau; Syntetisk bånd; Annet
lt-LT: Pakabinimo elementų medžiaga: Medvilninė virvė; Metalinis trosas; Metalinė grandinė; Poliesterio virvė; Sintetinis diržas; Kita
ko: 서스펜션 소재: 면 로프; 금속 케이블; 금속 체인; 폴리에스테르 로프; 합성 웨빙; 기타
pl: Materiał zawieszenia: Lina bawełniana; Linka metalowa; Łańcuch metalowy; Lina poliestrowa; Taśma syntetyczna; Inne
hr-HR: Materijal traka: Pamučno uže; Metalni kabel; Metalni lanac; Poliestersko uže; Sintetička traka; Ostalo
sv: Upphängningsmaterial: Bomullsrep; Metallkabel; Metallkedja; Polyesterrep; Syntetiskt vävband; Övrigt
el: Υλικό ανάρτησης: Βαμβακερό σχοινί; Μεταλλικό καλώδιο; Μεταλλική αλυσίδα; Πολυεστερικό σχοινί; Συνθετικός ιμάντας; Άλλο
fi: Jousituksen materiaali: Puuvillaköysi; Metallivaijeri; Metalliketju; Polyesteriköysi; Synteettinen nauha; Muu
fr: Matériau des éléments de suspension: Corde en coton; Câble métallique; Chaîne métallique; Corde en polyester; Sangle synthétique; Autre
cs: Materiál odpružení: Bavlněné lano; Kovové lanko; Kovový řetěz; Polyesterové lano; Syntetický popruh; Jiné
es: Material de la suspensión: Cuerda de algodón; Cable de metal; Cadena de metal; Cuerda de poliéster; Cinta sintética; Otro
zh-TW: 懸吊材質: 棉繩; 金屬纜線; 金屬鍊; 聚酯纖維繩; 合成織帶; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál zavesenia: Bavlnené lano; Kovové lano; Kovová reťaz; Polyesterové lano; Syntetický popruh; Iné
ja: 吊り下げ材: コットンロープ; 金属ケーブル; 金属チェーン; ポリエステルロープ; 合成ウェビング; その他
da: Materiale til ophæng: Bomuldsreb; Metalkabel; Metalkæde; Polyesterreb; Syntetisk gjord; Andet
sl-SI: Material vzmetenja: Bombažna vrv; Kovinska pletenica / jeklenica; Kovinska veriga; Poliestrska vrv; Sintetični trak; Drugo
zh-CN: 悬挂材质: 棉绳; 金属缆索; 金属链; 聚酯绳; 合成织带; 其他
it: Materiale della sospensione: Corda in cotone; Cavo in metallo; Catena in metallo; Corda in poliestere; Fettuccia sintetica; Altro
pt-PT: Material da suspensão: Corda de algodão; Cabo de metal; Corrente de metal; Corda de poliéster; Cinta sintética; Outro
de: Material der Aufhängung: Baumwollseil; Metallkabel; Metallkette; Polyesterseil; Synthetisches Gurtband; Sonstige
hu: Felfüggesztés anyaga: Pamutkötél; Fémkábel; Fémlánc; Poliészterkötél; Szintetikus heveder; Egyéb
tr: Süspansiyon malzemesi: Pamuk ip; Metal kablo; Metal zincir; Polyester ip; Sentetik kolon; Diğer
vi: Vật liệu treo: Dây thừng cotton; Cáp kim loại; Xích kim loại; Dây thừng polyester; Dây dệt tổng hợp; Khác
en: Suspension material: Cotton rope; Metal cable; Metal chain; Polyester rope; Synthetic webbing; Other
pt-BR: Suspensão material: Corda de algodão; Cabo de metal; Corrente de metal; Corda de poliéster; Fita sintética; Outros
th: วัสดุแขวนลอย: เชือกฝ้าย; สายเคเบิลโลหะ; โซ่โลหะ; เชือกโพลีเอสเตอร์; สายรัดใยสังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
nl: Ophangingsmateriaal: Katoenen touw; Metalen kabel; Metalen ketting; Polyester touw; Synthetische banden; Overig
ro-RO: Materialul de suspendare: Frânghie din bumbac; Cablu metalic; Lanț metalic; Frânghie din poliester; Chingă sintetică; Altele